Hawaii, session 2026, SB759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation is tasked with developing and financing low- and moderate-income housing projects and administering homeownership programs.  The department of Hawaiian home lands has a mandate to provide native Hawaiians a homesteading benefit through leases for residential, agricultural, or pastoral purposes.  As the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation and the department of Hawaiian home lands have similar missions to provide residents with affordable housing, amending the existing composition of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation board of directors will ensure the alignment of housing priorities while ensuring continued benefits for Hawaii's people. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to add the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission to the board of directors of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation. SECTION 2.  Section 201H-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§201H-3 Board; establishment, functions, duties.  (a) There is created a board of directors of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation consisting of [nine] ten members, of whom six shall be public members appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34.  At least four of the public members shall have knowledge and expertise in public or private financing and development of affordable housing. Public members shall be appointed from each of the counties of Honolulu, Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai.  At least one public member shall represent community advocates for low-income housing, affiliated with private nonprofit organizations that serve the residents of low-income housing.  The public members of the board shall serve four-year staggered terms; provided that the initial appointments shall be as follows: (1)  Two members to be appointed for four years; (2)  Two members to be appointed for three years; and (3)  Two members to be appointed for two years. The director of business, economic development, and tourism [and]; the director of finance[,]; and chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or their designated representatives, and a representative of the governor's office, shall be ex officio[,] voting members.  The corporation shall be headed by the board. (b)  The board of directors shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members; provided that the chairperson shall be a public member. The director of business, economic development, and tourism[,]; the director of finance[,]; the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission; and the governor's representative shall be ineligible to serve as chairperson of the board. (c)  [Five] Six members shall constitute a quorum, whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions by the corporation.  The members shall receive no compensation for services, but shall be entitled to necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________